Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Adult Public Assistance.

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.430.
Adult public assistance.

Financial assistance shall be given under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

, so far as practicable under appropriations made by law, to every aged, blind, or disabled needy resident who has not made a voluntary assignment or transfer of property to qualify for assistance. In this subsection, “resident” means a person who is living in the state voluntarily with the intention of making the state the person’s home and who is not living in the state for a temporary purpose.

The department shall determine the amount of assistance with regard to the resources and needs of the person and the conditions existing in each case. Assistance shall be in an amount that will provide the applicant with reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health in accordance with standards established by the department and with the standards established under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 (Title XVI, Social Security Act Supplemental Security Income Program). Direct payments for medical services and remedial care may not be considered in determining the maximum amount payable. When benefit amounts under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 are increased as a result of an increase in the cost of living, the state shall pass along the increase to recipients and shall increase the amount of the state contribution to recipients, other than those receiving a personal needs allowance, by a percentage of the state contribution equal to the percentage increase in the benefit amounts under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 if the legislature has appropriated money specifically for the purpose of increasing the state contribution because of an increase in federal benefit amounts under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383; this increase in the state contribution takes effect on the same day that the corresponding federal increase in benefits under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 takes effect.

Payment under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

may not be made to a person who is a resident of a public institution, except as a patient in a public medical institution, or a person who is a patient in a public or private institution for treatment of a mental disease. For purposes of this subsection, “resident” and “patient” do not include a person who is institutionalized for medical services for a period of less than three months if the person needs to continue to maintain and provide for the expenses of a home or living arrangement to which that person may return upon discharge from the institution.

A resident of an institution may, upon or in anticipation of leaving the institution, apply for assistance under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

instead of the support and maintenance provided in the institution.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, the department shall, in a manner that complies with federal requirements, reduce the maximum state contribution to recipients otherwise payable on August 24, 1993 to the maximum state contribution to recipients that was in effect on January 1, 1992. On and after August 24, 1993, the department shall, in a manner that complies with federal requirements, calculate the amount of monthly assistance for a recipient based on the maximum state contribution to recipients in effect on January 1, 1992, as modified by any increase under (b) of this section.

Unless the person is not eligible under the limited eligibility provision of 8 U.S.C. 1613, a state payment under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

shall be made to a person who

meets the requirements of state law;

is a qualified alien as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1641; and

otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383.

History.

(§ 51-2-51 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1953; am § 1 ch 110 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 11 FSSLA 1967; am § 2 ch 105 SLA 1967; am § 1 ch 234 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1975; am § 15 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 1989; am §§ 4, 5 ch 29 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the addition of subsection (f) by § 2, ch. 82, SLA 1997 (CSHB 153 (FIN)), see 1997 House Journal 442.

Sec. 47.25.435.
Exclusion of income.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

, if the applicable provisions of 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act), as amended, permit, in determining the need of an applicant for, or a recipient of, an assistance grant under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

, the department shall exclude from the computation of the applicant’s or recipient’s income the amounts specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1382a(b), as amended, amounts specified in regulations adopted to implement the supplemental security income provisions of federal law, and any amounts specified by the department by regulation so long as exclusion of those amounts is not in conflict with federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 64 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 149 SLA 1975; am § 16 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.885. Renumbered in 1973.

Cross references. —

For exclusion of permanent fund dividend from income or resources, see AS

43.23.085

.

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.440.
Application for assistance.

A person requesting assistance shall apply for it, either personally or through another, upon forms furnished and under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 51-2-52 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.450.
Investigation of applicant.

Upon application, the department shall investigate promptly and record the circumstances of each applicant to determine the facts supporting the application and other information required by the department.

History.

(§ 51-2-53 ACLA 1949; am § 17 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.455.
Interim assistance.

The department shall pay at least $280 a month to a person eligible for assistance under this chapter while the eligibility of the person for benefits under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1385 (Title XVI, Social Security Act, Supplemental Security Income Program) is being determined. Payments in excess of $280 a month may be made under this section if the department determines that money is available for excess payments.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may not make monthly payments in excess of the total amount of state and federal monthly payments to which the person would be entitled if the person is determined to be eligible for benefits under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1385.

A person applying for assistance under this section shall, as a condition of eligibility for assistance, agree to repay the state for assistance granted upon the person’s receipt of a benefit under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 for a month in which the person received interim assistance under this section. The monthly repayment required by this subsection may not exceed the amount of assistance that the person received under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383 for that month.

Beginning the first full month after a person is determined to be eligible for assistance under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1383, the department shall terminate interim assistance to that person under this section and begin payments to the person under AS

47.25.430

.

History.

(§ 18 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 6 ch 29 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.460.
Award, reduction, termination, and appeal.

Upon completion of the investigation, the department shall promptly decide whether the applicant is eligible for and should receive adult public assistance, the amount of it, the manner of paying it, and the date on which it starts. The department may make additional investigation that it considers necessary and shall make its decision as to the granting of assistance and the amount and nature of assistance as is justified and in conformity with AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

. The department shall notify the applicant of its decision in writing.

Assistance under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

is subject to review. If a recipient of adult public assistance or the spouse of a recipient with whom the recipient is living acquires nonexempt property exceeding resource limitations, or income sufficient to maintain the recipient properly, then the assistance granted to the recipient shall either be terminated or reduced to an amount reflecting the reduced need as determined by the department in accordance with applicable regulations. Upon review, the department may, after having provided opportunity for a hearing under (c) of this section, change the assistance granted or terminate it entirely if it finds that the circumstances are changed sufficiently to warrant this action.

A recipient whose award is proposed to be modified or terminated, or an applicant whose application is denied by the department, shall be granted an opportunity for a hearing before the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

). The hearing shall be held promptly after a request for hearing is made. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

Each award shall be paid on a monthly basis. In case it is impracticable by reason of slow or interrupted means of communication for a disbursement covering a month’s assistance to reach the recipient in due course, the department may transmit disbursements covering assistance for future months and may deliver all of them to the recipient at one time.

History.

(§ 51-2-54 ACLA 1949; am § 19 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 29 ch 175 SLA 2004; am E.O. No. 116, § 9 (2012))

Cross references. —

For transition provisions for pending proceedings, rights, liabilities, or obligations under this section in effect on July 1, 2012, and regulations implementing this section in effect on July 1, 2012, see § 16, E.O. No. 116, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “disbursement” for “warrant” twice in subsection (d).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, in the first sentence of (c), substituted “the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “a representative of the department appointed for that purpose”.

Sec. 47.25.470.
Payment when recipient incapacitated.

If a person receiving assistance is incapable of self-care or care of the funds granted under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

, the department may direct the payment of the funds to the recipient’s legally appointed guardian or to another person as designated by the department for the recipient’s benefit.

History.

(§ 51-2-55 ACLA 1949; am § 20 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.480.
Cancellation or reduction of assistance. [Repealed, § 30 ch 138 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 47.25.490.
Imprisoned recipients.

If a recipient is convicted of a crime or offense, and punished by imprisonment, payment may not be made during the period of imprisonment, and the department may, in its discretion, declare the assistance forfeited.

History.

(§ 51-2-57 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.25.500.
Recovery of assistance improperly granted.

If the department has reasonable grounds for believing that assistance was improperly granted, it shall investigate and document the grounds in the case file, and, if it appears as a result of the investigation that assistance was improperly granted, it may, after providing an opportunity for a hearing, terminate or reduce assistance and notify the recipient to that effect. The department shall continue the payment of benefits pending the hearing. The state has a claim against a person who received an improper amount of assistance. The claim may be enforced by an action instituted in the name of the state by the attorney general to recover the amount paid to the person, with interest, together with the necessary costs of the action.

If the department finds that recovery would work a financial hardship on the recipient to the extent that the health and well-being of the recipient would be threatened or that the costs of recovery would exceed the amount of assistance improperly granted, it shall waive recovery or reduce the amount to be recovered.

History.

(§ 51-2-58 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 1949; am § 21 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.510.
Modification of assistance. [Repealed, § 30 ch 138 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 47.25.515.
Cancellation of disbursements.

Disbursements issued to a recipient of assistance under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

after the date of death of the recipient shall be canceled.

Assistance disbursements issued before the death of the recipient but not collected before death shall be canceled, unless claimed by the authorized representative of the estate of the recipient within 90 days after the date of death.

The state is not liable to the estate, heirs, or creditors of the deceased assistance recipient for payment on disbursements canceled under (a) or (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 52 SLA 1964; am § 22 ch 138 SLA 1982; am § 30 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2006, rewrote this section.

Sec. 47.25.520.
Leaving the state.

A person receiving assistance who leaves the state may not receive assistance during the absence.

This section does not apply to a recipient who temporarily leaves the state for

medical treatment;

a vacation, business trip, or other absence of less than 30 days unless the time is extended in specific cases by the department;

vocational, professional, or other special education of more than 90 days if a comparable program is not reasonably available in the state; or

postsecondary education.

History.

(§ 51-2-60 ACLA 1949; am § 23 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.530.
Reports by department.

The department shall make reports in detail that are required of it by the governor or by the federal government or a federal agency.

History.

(§ 51-2-61 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 47.25.540.
Annual reports. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 47.25.550.
Alienation and attachment.

Assistance granted under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

is inalienable by an assignment or transfer and is exempt from garnishment, levy, or execution as provided in AS 09.38 (exemptions).

History.

(§ 51-2-63 ACLA 1949; am § 10 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 24 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Secs. 47.25.560, 47.25.570.
Government’s claim; security and lien. [Repealed, § 7 ch 234 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 47.25.575.
Property taken under eminent domain powers.

If a recipient’s property is taken for urban renewal or other public purposes and the recipient expresses an intent to purchase a personal dwelling, the proceeds that are paid the recipient as a result of the taking shall be paid by the taking authority into an escrow account under escrow instructions approved by the department.
If the proceeds are paid into such an account and are applied by the recipient within one year to the purchase of a personal dwelling, the proceeds may not cause a reduction of the amount of assistance to which the recipient would otherwise be entitled.
The department shall inform the recipient of the provisions of this section at the time of the taking.

History.

(§ 1 ch 60 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 234 SLA 1970)

Sec. 47.25.580.
Action against person liable for care of recipient.

If during the continuance of assistance the department finds that a person liable for the support of the recipient of assistance is able to provide the necessary care and support of the recipient and the person liable for the care and support of the recipient fails or refuses to support and care for the recipient, then the state has a cause of action for the assistance against the person liable for it.
The action may be brought in the name of the state by the attorney general against the person liable for the recovery of the amount of money, with interest, paid to the recipient, together with the costs and disbursements of the action.
The amount collected shall be paid to the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 51-2-66 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 33 SLA 1949; am § 25 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Sec. 47.25.590.
Policy and purpose of AS 47.25.430 — 47.25.615.

It is the policy of the state and the purpose of AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

to cooperate and coordinate with the United States government and its agencies in providing for and administering the laws of the federal and state governments having for their purpose adult public assistance for residents of this state.

The purpose of AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

is to furnish financial assistance as far as practicable to needy aged, blind, and disabled persons, and to help them attain self-support or self-care.

History.

(§ 51-2-69, ACLA 1949; § 51-2-50 ACLA 1949; added by § 2 ch 133 SLA 1957; am § 26 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

As amended by § 26, ch. 138, SLA 1982, this section contained a subsection (c) which was renumbered as AS

47.25.595

.

Administrative Code. —

For adult public assistance, see 7 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.25.595.
Transfer of funds.

The department may enter into contracts or arrangements with any federal agency, department, or official under which funds made available to the federal agency, department, or official may be transferred to the department and spent in accordance with AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

.

History.

(§ 26 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.25.590(c). Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 47.25.600.
Obtaining assistance by fraud. [Repealed, § 42 ch 143 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 47.25.610.
Penalty for violations.

A person who violates a provision of AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 51-2-68 ACLA 1949; am § 28 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

For penalties for class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035(b)

and

12.55.135(b)

.

Sec. 47.25.615.
Definitions.

In AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

,

“aged” means 65 or more years of age;

“assistance” means money payments to or medical care on behalf of, or any type of remedial care recognized by the department on behalf of, needy aged, blind, or disabled persons who are 18 or more years of age and residents of the state;

“blind” means having no vision or having vision that is so defective as to prevent the performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“disabled” means being unable to engage in substantial gainful activity by reason of a medically determinable physical or mental impairment that can be expected to result in death or that has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than 12 months;

“public institution” means a governmentally owned establishment that furnishes food, shelter, and some additional treatment or services to 16 or more persons;

“public medical institution” means a public hospital or a public institution providing medical care, except an institution for the treatment of mental disease.

History.

(§ 29 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Secs. 47.25.620 — 47.25.970.
Aid to the blind and permanently and totally disabled. [Repealed, § 30 ch 138 SLA 1982.]